Hawaii statutes.
§134-18 Qualified immunity for physicians,
psychologists, or psychiatrists who provide information on permit applicants.
There shall be no civil liability for any physician, psychologist, or
psychiatrist who provides information or renders an opinion in response to an
inquiry made for purposes of issuing a firearm permit under section 134-2 or
for purposes of investigating the continuing mental health of the holder of a
valid firearm permit provided that the physician, psychologist, or psychiatrist
acted without malice. [L 1992, c 287, §1; am L 1994, c 204, §10]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next